Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.120

Substitution of words designating department or secretary of transportation.

For purposes of harmonizing and clarifying the provisions of the statute sections published in the revised code of Washington, the code reviser may substitute words designating the department of transportation or the secretary of transportation, as appropriate, whenever necessary to effect the changes in meaning provided for in RCW 47.68.015 and 47.04.015 or any other act of the 1977 legislature.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 24.]

NOTES:

Federal requirements—1977 ex.s. c 151: See RCW 47.98.070.